Connecticut, session 2026, SB00456.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
Energy and Environmental Protection may establish a grant program
for the issuance of grants to nonprofit wildlife rehabilitation
organizations with one or more facilities in the state that register with
the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection and that meet
any requirements the commissioner establishes for the registration of
such wildlife rehabilitation organizations. The commissioner may
accept any funds or donations for the purpose of issuing such grants
and may establish an account for the receipt of any such funds or
donations. Any funds in such account shall not lapse at the conclusion
of any fiscal year and shall remain available to the commissioner for the
issuance of such grants.
(b) Any such registration requirement shall require a nonprofit
wildlife organization to submit, on an annual basis, to the commissioner
information concerning such organization, including, but not limited to,
the name and contact information for the owner or operator of such
wildlife rehabilitation organization, the location of any such facility in
the state, the specific species of wildlife rehabilitated at any such facility,
the financial structure of such wildlife rehabilitation organization, and
LCO 1 of 2

Substitute Bill No. 456
the background, education and training of any staff member or
volunteer, including, but not limited to, any veterinarian, utilized or
employed by any such wildlife rehabilitation organization and any
other information that the commissioner deems relevant. The
commissioner may impose an annual registration fee for any such
wildlife rehabilitation organization.
(c) The commissioner may establish criteria for the issuance of any
such grants, including, but not limited to, priority criteria for the
issuance of any such grants. The commissioner may adopt regulations,
in accordance with the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes,
to implement the provisions of this section.
Sec. 2. (Effective July 1, 2026) The sum of five hundred thousand
dollars is appropriated to the Department of Energy and Environmental
Protection from the General Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2027, for the purpose of funding the wildlife rehabilitation organization
grant program described in section 1 of this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 New section
ENV Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 2 of 2